District of Columbia statutes.
31-1318

Dissolution of insurer.

The Commissioner may petition for an order dissolving the corporate existence of a domestic insurer or the United States branch of an alien insurer domiciled in the District at the time he or she applies for a liquidation order. The court shall order dissolution of the corporation upon petition by the Commissioner upon or after the granting of a liquidation order. If the dissolution has not previously been ordered, it shall be effected by operation of law upon the discharge of the liquidator if the insurer is insolvent, but may be ordered by the court upon the discharge of the liquidator if the insurer is under a liquidation order for some other reason.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 19, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730
This section is referenced in § 31-1319.
1981 Ed., § 35-2818.